Maine, session 132, LD1402.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill proposes to convene a stakeholder group to study the long-term solvency of
the Maine Guaranteed Access Reinsurance Association and to make recommendations to
the Legislature regarding solutions to ensure that the association remains solvent.
Page 1 - 132LR1980(01)